Utah statutes.
20A-15-102.   Election to elect convention delegates.

(1) The governor shall:

(a)  issue a proclamation establishing the date of an election to elect 21 delegates to Utah's ratification convention from the state at large;

(b)  ensure that the election is held at least as soon as the next regular general election occurring more than three months after the amendment has been proposed by Congress; and

(c)  either call a special election or schedule the election to be held at the same time as a regular or municipal general election.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the election shall be conducted according to the procedures for a regular general election contained in this title.

